Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2727
Index to wills deposited; contents.

The index to wills deposited shall contain a memorandum of the date of each will deposited with the county judge for safekeeping, the names of the testators in alphabetical order, the name of the party delivering each will to the county judge, and a column in which shall be noted the final disposition of such will, whether returned to the testator, filed for probate, or otherwise disposed of.

G.S.1873, c. 14, § 33, p. 270;

Laws 1895, c. 31, § 1, p. 156;

Laws 1909, c. 41, § 1, p. 228;

R.S.1913, § 1233;

C.S.1922, § 1156;

C.S.1929, § 27-535;

R.S.1943, § 24-539;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 58;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-558.